src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_RELAT_KEL1
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_KEL1 ;
LEXICON N_KEL1 !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_LOMAN1_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_LOMAN1 ;
LEXICON N_LOMAN1 !!= * @CODE@ ломань:ломань %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LOMAN1 ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_OZIM1 !!= * @CODE@ озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO
 NMN_OZIM1 ;
LEXICON NMN_OZIM1
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KEL1 ;!2022-02-10 may need more work, Jaska
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_RUF1 !!= * @CODE@ озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO
 NMN_RUF1 ;
LEXICON NMN_RUF1
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KEL1 ;!2022-02-10 may need more work, Jaska
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_RECH1 !!= * @CODE@ озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO
 NMN_RECH1 ;
LEXICON NMN_RECH1
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KEL1 ;!2022-02-10 may need more work, Jaska
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_VESHCH1 !!= * @CODE@ озимь:озимь %^Ь2ZERO
 NMN_VESHCH1 ;
LEXICON NMN_VESHCH1
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KEL1 ;!2022-02-10 may need more work, Jaska
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_PEJ_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_PEJ ;
LEXICON N_J_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_J ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_J
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_J ;
LEXICON N_PEJ !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
 N_J ;
LEXICON N_J !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_SODYJ !!= * @CODE@ сода%>{иы}й, содый
! harmony: front
! no lative
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_TYL_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_TYL ;

LEXICON N_TYL_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_TYL ;
LEXICON N_TYL
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_KAL ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

!LEXICON N_KAL_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_KAL ;

LEXICON N_KAL-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{backHard} NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{backHard} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{backHard} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_LAV-PL
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{back} NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{back} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{back} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TEV-PL
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEL1-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_PEJ-PL
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_KAL-PL_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_KAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_LAK_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_LAK ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_LAK
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_LAK ;
LEXICON N_LAK
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_VEREK_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VEREK ;
LEXICON N_VEREK
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_VEREK ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_LAK-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_BRK_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_JORK ;
LEXICON N_JORK
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_JORK ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_FRK_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OCHERK ;
LEXICON N_OCHERK
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OCHERK ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KIT_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_KIT ;
LEXICON N_KIT_rusmyv
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KIT ;
LEXICON N_FT_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KIT ;
LEXICON N_KIT_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KIT ;
LEXICON N_KIT
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KIT-PL
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl+N:%>TLoss NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _KIT-Indef-Declension ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_ART_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_ART ;
LEXICON N_ART
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_ART ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_ALJT_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_ALJT ;
LEXICON N_ALJT
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_ALJT ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

!LEXICON N_GAJT1_rus100
!+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_GAJT1 ;
LEXICON N_GAJT1
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_GAJT1 ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_FSS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KLASS ;
LEXICON N_KLASS
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_FZH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KENKSH ;
LEXICON N_BSH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_BCH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_BZH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_OSH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_OSH
@P.POS.N@+Err/Orth-old1:@P.POS.N@ INE_INDEF/PX_ne ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@  NMN_DEF_SG_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@  NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%^H  NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
!!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@  _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@  _OSH-Indef-Declension ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@  N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N_OSH-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%^H NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_OZKS-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_LEVKS-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_FCH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_FSH ;
LEXICON N_FSH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_FSH ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_FSH
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_FSH ;
LEXICON N_KENKSH
 N_FSH ;
