src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
алгапонкст:алга#понкс N_OSH-PL  "alushousut" ;
алиментт:алимент N_KIT-PL  "elatusapu" ;
андомапель:андома#пель N_KEL1  "ruoka" ;
анекдот:анекдот N_KIT  "kasku" ;
арзамаз:арзамаз N_OSH  "" ;
аттестат:аттестат N_KIT  "päästötodistus" ;
барышник:барышник N_LAK  "" ;
благодетель:благодетель N_KEL1  "" ;
боцькаверькс:боцька#верькс N_OSH  "" ;
букет:букет N_KIT  "" ;
буровик:буровик N_LAK  "" ;
бутыл:бутыл N_TYL  "" ;
вайгельсант:вайгель#сан N_KAL-PL  "" ;
ванстомапель:ванстома#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
ваткас:ваткас N_OSH  "" ;
вениль:вениль N_KEL1  "" ;
верьгизленкс:верьгиз#ленкс N_OSH  "" ;
вигинепейть:вигинепей N_KAL-PL  "" ;
визит:визит N_KIT  "vieraskäynti" ;
водитель:водитель N_KEL1  "" ;
галстук:галстук N_LAK  "solmio" ;
гладиолус:гладиолус N_OSH  "" ;
грифель:грифель N_KEL1  "rihveli" ;
грунт:грунт N_KIT  "maa" ;
гыл:гыл N_TYL  "" ;
данной:данной N_PEJ  "" ;
дилетант:дилетант N_KIT  "" ;
дневник:дневник N_LAK  "päiväkirja" ;
дуэль:дуэль N_KEL1  "kaksintaistelu" ;
жолвак:жолвак N_LAK  "" ;
зонт:зонт N_KIT  "" ;
избач:избач N_OSH  "lukutuvan hoitaja" ;
икельпель:икель#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
инфразвук:инфразвук N_LAK  "" ;
калавтомат:калавтомат N_KIT  "" ;
калкедькс:калкедькс N_OSH  "" ;
кандолазт:кандолаз N_OSH-PL  "" ;
кандомапель:кандома#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
карьпилекс+Err/Sub:карь#билекс N_OSH  "virsunreikä" ;
карязт:каряз N_OSH-PL  "" ;
квартирант:квартирант N_KIT  "" ;
кельмепель:кельме#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
келянч:келянч N_OSH  "" ;
кизяк:кизяк N_LAK  "" ;
кирнявтовкс:кирнявтовкс N_OSH  "" ;
колвайгель:колвайгель N_KEL1  "" ;
колит:колит N_KIT  "" ;
конёвпанкс:конёвпанкс N_OSH  "" ;
конёк:конёк N_LAK  "" ;
коптявт:коптявт N_KIT  "" ;
кудоалкс:кудо#алкс N_OSH  "" ;
кукурузник:кукурузник N_LAK  "" ;
куловпуль:куловпуль N_KEL1  "" ;
культ:культ N_KIT  "kultti" ;
курокст:курокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
кшиотраз:кши#отраз N_OSH  "" ;
ламбасей:ламбасей N_PEJ  "" ;
левшсывель:левш#сывель N_KEL1  "" ;
ленкс:ленкс N_OSH  "" ;
лик:лик N_LAK  "" ;
лимит:лимит N_KIT  "limiitti" ;
мамштамопель:мамштамо#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
манявкс:манявкс N_OSH  "petos" ;
медикамент:медикамент N_KIT  "lääke" ;
меелькст:меелькс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
меринос:меринос N_OSH  "" ;
мерник:мерник N_LAK  "" ;
модель:модель N_KEL1  "(pienois)malli" ;
моцькаудалкст:моцькаудалкс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
мызыл:мызыл N_TYL  "" ;
наводчик:наводчик N_LAK  "suuntaaja" ;
наравт:наравт N_KIT  "tukanleikkuu" ;
нерявкст:нерявкс N_OSH-PL  "oraat" ;
ноготт:ногот N_KIT-PL  "" ;
норвамопель:норвамо#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
оазис:оазис N_OSH  "" ;
облук:облук N_LAK  "" ;
объеткат:объеткат N_KIT  "" ;
онкстамопель:онкстамо#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
отступой:отступой N_PEJ  "" ;
палт:палт N_KIT  "" ;
панарт:панар N_KAL-PL  "" ;
парик:парик N_LAK  "peruukki" ;
пеель:пеель N_KEL1  "veitsi" ;
пезэмкс:пезэмкс N_OSH  "seiväs" ;
петракрёст:петракрёст N_KIT  "" ;
пецькаменель:пецькаменель N_KEL1  "" ;
пилявкст:пилявкс N_OSH-PL  "sahajauhot" ;
пинеме#пулокст:пинеме#пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
подводчик:подводчик N_LAK  "" ;
польдерькс:польдерькс N_OSH  "" ;
понкст:понкс N_OSH-PL  "housut" ;
поремапель:порема#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
портрет:портрет N_KIT  "muotokuva" ;
посаломщык:посаломщык N_LAK  "" ;
прогресс:прогресс N_KLASS  "edistys" ;
проспект:проспект N_KIT  "" ;
прямоугольник:прямоугольник N_LAK  "suorakaide" ;
пулокст:пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
пулопелькст:пуло#пелькс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
растворитель:растворитель N_KEL1  "" ;
резонанс:резонанс N_OSH  "resonanssi" ;
рейтузат:рейтузат N_KIT  "" ;
розьпулокст:розь#пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
романтик:романтик N_LAK  "romantikko" ;
санпросвет:санпросвет N_KIT  "" ;
сезьганполк:сезьган#полк N_LAK  "" ;
сельмукшт:сельмукш N_OSH-PL  "(mon.) silmälasit" ;
скальпель:скаль#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
сокст:сокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
сорокапотмакс:сорока#потмакс N_OSH  "" ;
справочник:справочник N_LAK  "käsikirja" ;
сусик:сусик N_LAK  "" ;
сыяфт:сыяфт N_KIT  "" ;
сювапулокст:сюва#пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
тазт:таз N_OSH-PL  "syyhy" ;
танчкавтомапель:танчкавтома#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
тикшесяворькс:тикшесяворькс N_OSH  "" ;
тупик:тупик N_LAK  "umpikuja" ;
тустт:туст N_KIT-PL  "" ;
унст:унс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
ушмовий:ушмо#вий N_PEJ  "" ;
фантик:фантик N_LAK  "" ;
физмат:физмат N_KIT  "" ;
фотоувеличитель:фотоувеличитель N_KEL1  "" ;
фриц:фриц N_OSH  "" ;
цёлак:цёлак N_LAK  "kehno" ;
чамаумарть:чамаумарь N_KAL-PL  "" ;
чиярмакт:чи#ярмак N_LAK-PL  "" ;
шахматт:шахмат N_KIT-PL  "" ;
шивеч:шивеч N_OSH  "räätäli" ;
штапель:шта#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
штёлк:штёлк N_LAK  "" ;
экспонат:экспонат N_KIT  "näyttelyesine" ;
эчкавкст:эчкавкс N_OZKS-PL  "leseet" ;
ёртовкст:ёртовкс N_OSH-PL  "jätteet" ;
